Hawaii statutes.
§518-1 Unlawful covenants. It is
unlawful for any person, association, firm, or corporation, as the lessor, to
lease agricultural or farm lands with covenants or clauses in the lease stating
that the lessee must sell all or a portion of the crop grown on the
agricultural or farm lands to the lessor. [L 1961, c 12, §1; Supp, §345C-1; HRS
§518-1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next